District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.120

Mayor; duties and functions.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 227, ch. 269, § 120
Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 3205(j), 25 DCR 5740
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.120.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.21.
1973 Ed., § 29-935.